Washington statutes.
RCW 16.52.225

Nonambulatory livestock—Transporting or accepting delivery—Gross misdemeanor—Definition.

(1) Unless otherwise cited for a civil infraction by the department of agriculture under RCW 16.36.116(2), a person is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable as provided in RCW 9A.20.021 if he or she knowingly transports or accepts delivery of live nonambulatory livestock to, from, or between any livestock market, feedlot, slaughtering facility, or similar facility that trades in livestock. The transport or acceptance of each nonambulatory livestock animal is considered a separate and distinct violation.

(2) Nonambulatory livestock must be humanely euthanized before transport to, from, or between locations listed in subsection (1) of this section.

(3) Livestock that was ambulatory prior to transport to a feedlot and becomes nonambulatory because of an injury sustained during transport may be unloaded and placed in a separate pen for rehabilitation at the feedlot.

(4) For the purposes of this section, "nonambulatory livestock" means cattle, sheep, swine, goats, horses, mules, or other equine that cannot rise from a recumbent position or cannot walk, including but not limited to those with broken appendages, severed tendons or ligaments, nerve paralysis, a fractured vertebral column, or metabolic conditions.

[ 2009 c 347 s 2; 2004 c 234 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2004 c 234: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [March 31, 2004]." [ 2004 c 234 s 2.]